FullInp.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

LEXICON Root
    Nouns ;
    Verbs ;

LEXICON Nouns 
    PrefixAgr ; 
    Nounclass ;

LEXICON PrefixAgr !Not required
        Nounclass ;

LEXICON Nounclass
        ALIEN ; 
        INALIEN

LEXICON ALIEN
stems # ; ! alienable nouns can optionally take the prefixe agreement markers but no other morphology

LEXICON INALIEN
stems ABS ; ! Inalienable nouns can optionally take the prefixes and if they do they stop here, if they don't they continue on to the absolutive marking

LEXICON ABS ! Only for unpossessed inalienable nouns
 ti # ;
    # ;

LEXICON Verbs
    Polarity ; ! negative vs affirmative all verb classes start with one

LEXICON Polarity
aa Verbclass ; ! optional verbal prefix indicating negative polarity
    Verbclass ; ! absence of prefix indicating affirmative polarity

LEXICON Verbclass
    VPrefixAgr ; !Transitive, active instransitive, and inactive instransitive verbs which take prefix agreement 
    SIV ; !Stative instransitive verbs which do not take prefix agreement

LEXICON VPrefixAgr !Same as Prefix Agr
      Preverbclasses  ;

LEXICON Preverbclasses
    TV ;
    AIV ;
    IAIV ;

LEXICON SIV
stems Mood ;

LEXICON Mood 
    Tense ;

LEXICON Tense 
    SuffixAgr ; ! Continue only if you are in the TV class or the SIV class
    # ; ! optionality is only possible for TV class, SIV must have Suffixagr

LEXICON SuffixAgr
    # ;

LEXICON TV 
stems Mood ;

LEXICON AIV 
stems Mood ;

LEXICON IAIV 
stems Mood ;
        
